Utah statutes.
19-3-320.   Efforts to prevent siting of any nuclear waste facility to include economic development study regarding Native American reservation lands within the state.

(1)  It is the intent of the Legislature that the department, in its efforts to prevent the siting of a nuclear waste facility within the exterior borders of the state, include in its work the study under Subsection (2) and the report under Subsection (3).

(2)  It is the intent of the Legislature that the Department of Environmental Quality, in coordination with the office of the governor, and in cooperation with the Departments of Heritage and Arts, Human Services, Health, Workforce Services, Agriculture and Food, Natural Resources, and Transportation, the state Office of Education, and the Board of Regents:

(a)  study the needs and requirements for economic development on the Native American reservations within the state; and

(b)  prepare, on or before November 30, 2001, a long-term strategic plan for economic development on the reservations.

(3)  It is the intent of the Legislature that this plan, prepared under Subsection (2)(b), shall be distributed to the governor and the members of the Legislature on or before December 31, 2001.

